Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-918
Department of Correctional Services; adopt rules and regulations.

The Department of Correctional Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 81-907 and 81-909 to 81-918.

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 12;

Laws 1981, LB 536, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 767, § 6.